Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-4-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Consideration” means the consideration charged, whether or not received, for the occupancy in a hotel valued in money whether to be received in money, goods, labor or otherwise, including all receipts, cash, credits, property and services of any kind or nature without any deduction therefrom whatsoever. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to imply that consideration is charged when the space provided to the person is complimentary from the operator and no consideration is charged to or received from any person;

“Convention center” means any land, improvement, structure, building or part of a building comprised of facilities for conventions, public assemblies, conferences, trade exhibitions or other business, social, cultural, scientific and public interest events, along with any associated hotel accommodations; transportation infrastructure; tourism, theatre, retail business and commercial office space facilities; parking facilities or any other structure or facility constructed, leased, equipped, renovated or acquired for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter, and also includes, but is not limited to, parks, greenways, open spaces, roads, streets, highways, curbs, bridges, flood control facilities and utility services, such as water, sanitary sewer, electricity, gas and natural gas and telecommunications that are constructed, leased, equipped, renovated or acquired as a supporting system or facility for any of the purposes set forth in chapter 89 of this title; provided, that any such supporting system or facility is dedicated for public use;

“Counties and municipalities” means the counties having a metropolitan form of government and municipalities with a population of five thousand (5,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located partly within such counties and partly within adjacent counties;

“Hotel” means any structure, or any portion of any structure, that is occupied or intended or designed for occupancy by transients for dwelling, lodging or sleeping purposes, and includes any hotel, inn, tourist court, tourist camp, tourist cabin, motel, short-term rental unit or any place in which rooms, lodgings or accommodations are furnished to transients for a consideration;

“Occupancy” means the use or possession, or the right to the use or possession, of any room, lodgings or accommodations in a hotel for a period of less than thirty (30) continuous days;

“Operator” means the person operating the hotel, whether as owner, lessee or otherwise;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, social club, fraternal organization, joint stock company, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, or any other group or combination acting as a unit;

“Residential dwelling” means a cabin, house, or structure used or designed to be used as an abode or home of a person, family, or household, and includes a single-family dwelling, a portion of a single-family dwelling, or an individual residential dwelling in a multi-dwelling building, such as an apartment building, condominium, cooperative, or timeshare;

“Short-term rental unit” means a residential dwelling that is rented wholly or partially for a fee for a period of less than thirty (30) continuous days and does not include a hotel as defined in § 68-14-302 or a bed and breakfast establishment or a bed and breakfast homestay as those terms are defined in § 68-14-502;

“Short-term rental unit marketplace” means any person or entity that provides a platform for compensation, through which a third party offers to rent a short-term rental unit to an occupant;

“Tax collection official” means the department of finance of the county or municipality, as applicable, or the county clerk, if so designated by ordinance of the legislative body of any municipality having a metropolitan form of government and a population of more than four hundred fifty thousand (450,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Tourism” means the planning and conducting of programs of information and publicity designed to attract to the county tourists, visitors and other interested persons from outside the area and also to encourage and coordinate the efforts of other public and private organizations or groups of citizens to publicize the facilities and attractions of the area for the same purposes. “Tourism” also means the acquisition, construction and remodeling of facilities useful in the attraction and promoting of tourist, convention and recreational businesses;

“Tourist commission” means a seven-person body established subject to the same local organic law as other boards and commissions established by the charter of the metropolitan government; and

“Transient” means any person who exercises occupancy or is entitled to occupancy for any rooms, lodgings or accommodations in a hotel for a period of less than thirty (30) days.

Terms used in this chapter that are not otherwise defined shall have the same meaning ascribed to them in chapter 88 of this title.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3726; Acts 1990, ch. 636, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 758, § 3; 2007, ch. 461, § 1; 2009, ch. 474, § 2; 2020, ch. 787, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, inserted “, short-term rental unit” in (4); and added the definitions of “Residential Dwelling”, “Short-term rental unit”, and “Short-term rental unit marketplace” in alphabetical order and redesignated the following definitions accordingly.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 787, § 12. January 1, 2021.

Cross-References. Multiple taxation of same privilege,§67-4-503.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability, OAG 86-68, 1986 Tenn. AG LEXIS 159 (3/17/86); OAG 87-164, 1987 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (10/26/87).

Sales tax is due on short-term rentals of homes, apartments, and rooms in Tennessee that are arranged through websites. These rentals qualify as “hotels” subject to a hotel occupancy privilege tax. The property owner is ultimately responsible for collecting and paying the taxes. OAG 15-78, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (12/1/2015).

7-4-102. Authorization, nature and levy of tax — Convention centers.

There is hereby authorized a privilege tax upon the privilege of occupancy in any hotel of each transient in an amount not to exceed three percent (3%) of the consideration charged by the operator, except as provided in subsection (b). The tax so imposed is a privilege tax upon the transient occupying the room and is to be collected and distributed as provided in this chapter, and the tax shall be approved by ordinance of the metropolitan council.

In addition to the tax authorized in subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b), there is hereby authorized an additional privilege tax upon the privilege of occupancy in any hotel of each transient in an amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of the consideration charged by the operator in metropolitan counties having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census. The tax so imposed is a privilege tax upon the transient occupying the room and is to be collected and distributed as provided in this chapter, and the tax shall be approved by ordinance of the metropolitan council.

There is hereby authorized an additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax authorized pursuant to subsection (a) when the metropolitan government enters into a binding contract with a general contractor for the construction of a convention center, the additional one-percent increase to be used exclusively for the purpose of constructing, financing and operating a convention center. Such tax so imposed is a privilege tax upon the transient occupying the room of any hotel and shall be approved by ordinance of the metropolitan council. Such ordinance shall include provisions to reflect the intent and effect of this subsection (b). This subsection (b) only applies in counties having a metropolitan form of government that have a population of not less than four hundred thousand (400,000) and not more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

The metropolitan council in a county having a metropolitan form of government which has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is authorized to impose an additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax authorized pursuant to subdivision (b)(1). The additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax may be imposed throughout the county or only within a tourist development zone created within the county. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(3), the proceeds from the tax shall be retained by the metropolitan government and distributed in accordance with § 7-4-110(b). The tax so imposed is a privilege tax upon the transient occupying the room of a hotel located within the territory of the metropolitan government or a tourist development zone. The ordinance shall include provisions to reflect the intent and effect of this subdivision (b)(2).

If there has been designated within a county described in subdivision (b)(2) a secondary tourist development zone, then all of the proceeds of the additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax authorized pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) which are derived from the secondary tourist development zone shall be deposited in the general fund of the county in which the secondary tourist development zone is located.

A municipality with a population of five thousand (5,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, lying partly within a county with a metropolitan form of government and partly within an adjacent county may levy a privilege tax on the privilege of occupancy in any hotel of each transient in an amount, set by the governing body of such municipality, in an amount not exceeding that set in subsection (a). The tax shall be collected and distributed as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3727; Acts 1982, ch. 559, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1990, ch. 636, § 3; 1999, ch. 320, § 1; 2002, ch. 571, § 1; 2007, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 461, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 320, § 3 provided that subdivision (a)(2) be repealed on June 30, 2002; however, Acts 2002, ch. 571, § 1 deleted the repeal provision in Acts 1999, ch. 320, § 3, effective April 7, 2002.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Sales tax is due on short-term rentals of homes, apartments, and rooms in Tennessee that are arranged through websites. These rentals qualify as “hotels” subject to a hotel occupancy privilege tax. The property owner is ultimately responsible for collecting and paying the taxes. OAG 15-78, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (12/1/2015).

The use of proceeds of the tourist accommodation tax imposed by Moore County under T.C.A. §7-4-102(a)(1) is limited only by Article II, Section 29, of the Tennessee Constitution, which requires that the proceeds be used for purposes of the county. OAG 16-02, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/12/2016).

7-4-103. Tax added to room invoice — Tax on short-term rental unit — Collection and remittance of tax.

The tax shall be added by each and every operator to each invoice prepared by the operator for the occupancy of the operator's hotel, such invoice to be given directly or transmitted to the transient, and the tax shall be collected by the operator from the transient and remitted to the tax collection official.

Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, on or after January 1, 2021, the tax, when levied upon the occupancy of a short-term rental unit secured through a short-term rental unit marketplace, must be collected and remitted in accordance with title 67, chapter 4, part 15.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 3; modified; T.C.A., § 6-3728; Acts 1994, ch. 758, § 4; 2020, ch. 787, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 787, § 12. January 1, 2021.

Attorney General Opinions. Sales tax is due on short-term rentals of homes, apartments, and rooms in Tennessee that are arranged through websites. These rentals qualify as “hotels” subject to a hotel occupancy privilege tax. The property owner is ultimately responsible for collecting and paying the taxes. OAG 15-78, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (12/1/2015).

7-4-104. When tax collected and remitted — Compensation to operator for administrative expenses.

The tax levied by this chapter shall be remitted by all operators who lease, rent, or charge for any rooms to the metropolitan department of finance not later than the twentieth of each month next following collection from the transient. The operator is hereby required to collect the tax from the transient at the time of the presentation of the invoice for the occupancy whether prior to occupancy or not, as may be the custom of the operator; the obligation to the metropolitan government entitled to such tax shall be that of the operator.

For the purpose of compensating the operator in accounting for and remitting the tax levied by this chapter, the operator shall be allowed two percent (2%) of the amount of tax due and accounted for and remitted to the tax collection official in the form of a deduction in submitting the operator's report and paying the amount due by the operator; provided, that the amount due was not delinquent at the time of payment.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-3729; Acts 1994, ch. 758, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Sales tax is due on short-term rentals of homes, apartments, and rooms in Tennessee that are arranged through websites. These rentals qualify as “hotels” subject to a hotel occupancy privilege tax. The property owner is ultimately responsible for collecting and paying the taxes. OAG 15-78, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (12/1/2015).

7-4-105. Prohibited representations.

No operator of a hotel shall advertise or state in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, that the tax or any part of the tax will be assumed or absorbed by the operator, or that it will be added to the rent, or that, if added, any part will be refunded.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-3730.

7-4-106. Violations and penalties — Delinquent taxes.

Taxes collected by an operator that are not remitted to the tax collection official on or before the due dates are delinquent.

An operator shall be liable for interest on such delinquent taxes from the due date at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum, and in addition for penalty of one percent (1%) for each month or fraction of a month that such taxes are delinquent. Such interest and penalty shall become a part of the tax required in this chapter to be remitted.

Willful refusal of an operator to collect or remit the tax or willful refusal of a transient to pay the tax imposed is a Class C misdemeanor.

Any fine levied in this chapter shall be applicable to each individual transaction involving lodging services paid by a customer to the operator in those cases when the operator fails or refuses to pay the tax payable.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-3731; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

7-4-107. Records.

It is the duty of every operator liable for the collection and payment of any tax imposed by this chapter to keep and preserve for a period of three (3) years all records necessary to determine the amount of the tax, which records the tax collection official shall have the right to inspect at all reasonable times.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-3732.

7-4-108. Administration and enforcement — Taxpayer remedies.

In administering and enforcing this chapter, the tax collection official shall have, as additional powers, those powers and duties with respect to collection of taxes provided in title 67 or otherwise provided by law; provided, that title 67, chapter 1, part 17, does not apply to any record, document, or other information pertaining to a tax on the privilege of occupancy in a hotel imposed pursuant to this chapter.

Upon any claim of illegal assessment and collection, the taxpayer has the remedy provided in § 67-1-911, it being the intent of this chapter that the provisions of law that apply to the recovery of state taxes illegally assessed and collected be conformed to apply to the recovery of taxes illegally assessed and collected under the authority of this chapter; provided, that the tax collection official shall possess those powers and duties as provided in § 67-1-707, with respect to the adjustment and settlement with taxpayers of all errors of taxes collected by the tax collection official under the authority of this chapter and to direct the refunding of the adjustments and settlements. Notice of any tax paid under protest shall be given to the tax collection official, and suit for recovery shall be brought against the tax collection official.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-3733; Acts 2016, ch. 796, § 4.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added the proviso at the end of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 796, § 6. April 14, 2016.

7-4-109. Tourist commission.

For the purpose of promoting tourist, convention, and recreational activity, authorization is granted to establish, and there shall be established, a tourist commission of either seven (7) members or nine (9) members as provided in this section. This commission shall be comprised of persons selected by the mayor of the metropolitan government in the following manner:

Three (3) commissioners from a list of five (5) persons submitted by the hotel and motel association, or if expanded pursuant to subdivision (a)(2), four (4) commissioners from a list of not less than six (6) persons submitted by the hotel and motel association;

One (1) commissioner from a list of three (3) persons submitted by the area chamber of commerce; and

Three (3) commissioners selected by the mayor of the metropolitan government from tourist related industries, or, if expanded pursuant to subdivision (2), four (4) commissioners selected by the mayor of the metropolitan government from tourist related industries.

At least two (2) of the members of the commission shall be selected from minorities, as well as members of the sex that historically have been underrepresented on the tourist commission. If a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than four hundred seventy thousand (470,000) nor more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, creates a tourist commission consisting of nine (9) members, at least two (2) of the members of the tourist commission shall be appointed consistent with this subdivision (a)(2).

The commissioners shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years, and vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that original appointments are made but shall be for the duration of the unexpired term only; commencing in 1988, the terms of the commissioners shall be of such length and so arranged that the terms of one third (1/3) of the commission shall expire each year.

As relating to budgetary and fiscal matters and expenditures, the commission shall be subject to the same provisions of the local organic law as the other boards and commissions established by the charter of the metropolitan government, and the commission shall be responsible for preparing and submitting a budget for all funds to be expendable pursuant to § 7-4-110(a)(1) and (2) for appropriate action by the metropolitan government.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-3734; Acts 1988, ch. 885, §§ 1-5.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-4-110. Additional privilege tax.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), until the metropolitan council in a county having a metropolitan form of government which has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, approves an ordinance to impose an additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax authorized pursuant to § 7-4-102(b)(2), the proceeds from the tax authorized to be levied in § 7-4-102(a)(1) shall be retained by the metropolitan government and distributed as follows:

One third (1/3) shall be used for direct promotion of tourism;

One third (1/3) shall be used for tourist related activities; and

One third (1/3) shall be deposited in the general fund.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), when the metropolitan council in a county having a metropolitan form of government which has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, approves an ordinance to impose an additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax authorized pursuant to § 7-4-102(b)(2), the proceeds from the tax authorized to be levied pursuant to this chapter, other than the tax described in § 7-4-102(c), shall be retained by the metropolitan government and distributed as follows:

One third (1/3) in its entirety shall be used for the direct promotion of tourism;

One third (1/3) in its entirety shall be maintained in a reserve fund to be used exclusively for the purpose of modifying, constructing, financing and operating a convention center;

One sixth (1/6) shall be used for tourist related activities which may include funding a convention center; and

One sixth (1/6) shall be deposited in the general fund of the metropolitan government.

If the total tax collections received pursuant to this section and dedicated to the purposes contained in subdivisions (b)(1), (2) and (3) exceed the amounts necessary to fund the obligations under those subdivisions, the excess shall be placed in a reserve fund and expended only for tourist related activities.

Until the metropolitan council in a county having a metropolitan form of government which has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, approves an ordinance to impose an additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax authorized pursuant to § 7-4-102(b)(2), the proceeds from the tax authorized to be levied in § 7-4-102(a)(2) shall be retained by the metropolitan government having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and shall be used solely for the direct promotion of tourism.

The proceeds from the tax authorized by § 7-4-102(c) shall be retained by the collecting municipality and used exclusively for tourist related activities within the municipality.

If there has been designated within the county a secondary tourism development zone, then one third (1/3) of the proceeds of the tax authorized to be levied in § 7-4-102(a)(1) and all of the proceeds of the tax authorized to be levied in § 7-4-102(a)(2) which are derived from the secondary tourism development zone shall be paid to the county for deposit in its general fund, but only to the extent that the same exceeds one third (1/3) of the proceeds of the tourist accommodation tax from the secondary tourism development zone for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, increased by three percent (3%) for each fiscal year thereafter (i.e., in fiscal year 2007, one hundred three percent (103%) of the proceeds for fiscal year 2006; in fiscal year 2008, one hundred three percent (103%) of the amount so calculated for fiscal year 2007; etc.).

If there has been designated within the county a secondary tourism development zone, until the metropolitan council approves an ordinance to impose an additional one-percent increase to the privilege tax authorized pursuant to § 7-4-102(b)(2), the metropolitan council may by resolution authorize one third (1/3) of the proceeds of the tax authorized to be levied in § 7-4-102(a)(1) and all of the proceeds of the tax authorized to be levied in § 7-4-102(a)(2) which are derived from the secondary tourism development zone to be paid to the county for deposit in its general fund, but only to the extent that the same exceeds one third (1/3) of the proceeds of the tourist accommodation tax from the secondary tourism development zone for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2006, increased by three percent (3%) for each fiscal year thereafter (i.e., in fiscal year 2007, one hundred three percent (103%) of the proceeds for fiscal year 2006; in fiscal year 2008, one hundred three percent (103%) of the amount so calculated for fiscal year 2007, etc.).

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 10; T.C.A., § 6-3735; Acts 1982, ch. 559, § 3; 1990, ch. 636, § 4; 1999, ch. 320, § 2; 2002, ch. 571, § 1; 2007, ch. 422, § 3; 2007, ch. 461, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-4-111. Tax additional to other taxes and fees.

The tax levied in this chapter shall be in addition to all other taxes levied or authorized to be levied whether in the form of excise, license, or privilege taxes, and shall be in addition to all other fees and taxes now levied or authorized to be levied.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-3736.

7-4-112. Applicability.

This chapter shall only apply to those counties having a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1976, ch. 704, § 12; T.C.A., § 6-3737.